Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.291

Annual report for secretary of state.

A limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6116; 2009 c 188 s 210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.